Florida, session 2026, SB1096.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âSubsections (1), (3), and (5) of section 760.11, 20 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 21 760.11âAdministrative and civil remedies; construction.â 22 (1)âAny person aggrieved by a violation of ss. 760.01 23 760.10 may file a complaint with the commission within 365 days 24 after of the alleged violation, naming the employer, employment 25 agency, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee, 26 or, in the case of an alleged violation of s. 760.10(5), the 27 person responsible for the violation and describing the 28 violation. Any person aggrieved by a violation of s. 509.092 may 29 file a complaint with the commission within 365 days after of 30 the alleged violation, naming the person responsible for the 31 violation and describing the violation. The commission, a 32 commissioner, or the Attorney General may in like manner file 33 such a complaint. On the same day the complaint is filed with 34 the commission, the commission shall clearly stamp on the face 35 of the complaint the date the complaint was filed with the 36 commission. In lieu of filing the complaint with the commission, 37 a complaint under this section may be filed with the federal 38 Equal Employment Opportunity Commission or with any unit of 39 government of the state which is a fair-employment-practice 40 agency under 29 C.F.R. ss. 1601.70-1601.80. If the date the 41 complaint is filed is clearly stamped on the face of the 42 complaint, that date is the date of filing. The date the 43 complaint is filed with the commission for purposes of this 44 section is the earliest date of filing with the Equal Employment 45 Opportunity Commission, the fair-employment-practice agency, or 46 the commission. The complaint must shall contain a short and 47 plain statement of the facts describing the violation and the 48 relief sought. The commission may require additional information 49 to be in the complaint. The commission, within 5 days after of 50 the complaint being filed, shall by registered mail send a copy 51 of the complaint to the person who allegedly committed the 52 violation. The person who allegedly committed the violation may 53 file an answer to the complaint within 25 days after of the date 54 the complaint was filed with the commission. Any answer filed 55 must shall be mailed to the aggrieved person by the person 56 filing the answer. Both the complaint and the answer must shall 57 be verified. 58 (3)âExcept as provided in subsection (2), the commission 59 shall investigate the allegations in the complaint. Within 180 60 days after of the filing of the complaint, the commission shall 61 determine whether if there is reasonable cause to believe that 62 discriminatory practice has occurred in violation of the Florida 63 Civil Rights Act of 1992. When the commission determines whether 64 or not there is reasonable cause, the commission by registered 65 mail shall promptly notify the aggrieved person and the 66 respondent of the reasonable cause determination, the date of 67 such determination, and the options available under this 68 section. 69 (5)âIn any civil action brought under this section, the 70 court may issue an order prohibiting the discriminatory practice 71 and providing affirmative relief from the effects of the 72 practice, including back pay. The court may also award 73 compensatory damages, including, but not limited to, damages for 74 mental anguish, loss of dignity, and any other intangible 75 injuries, and punitive damages. Sections 768.72 and 768.73 The 76 provisions of ss. 768.72 and 768.73 do not apply to this 77 section. The judgment for the total amount of punitive damages 78 awarded under this section to an aggrieved person may shall not 79 exceed $100,000. In any action or proceeding under this 80 subsection, the court, in its discretion, may allow the 81 prevailing party a reasonable attorney fees attorneyâs fee as 82 part of the costs. It is the intent of the Legislature that 83 attorney this provision for attorneyâs fees be interpreted in a 84 manner consistent with federal case law involving a Title VII 85 action. The right to trial by jury is preserved in any such 86 private right of action in which the aggrieved person is seeking 87 compensatory or punitive damages, and any party may demand a 88 trial by jury. The commissionâs determination of reasonable 89 cause is not admissible into evidence in any civil proceeding, 90 including any hearing or trial, except to establish for the 91 court the right to maintain the private right of action. A civil 92 action brought under this section must be filed shall be 93 commenced no later than 1 year after the date of determination 94 of reasonable cause by the commission or the issuance of a 95 Notice of Right to Sue from the Equal Employment Opportunity 96 Commission, whichever occurs first. If a determination is not 97 made by the commission or a Notice of Right to Sue is not issued 98 by the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission within 180 days 99 after the filing of the complaint, a civil action may be brought 100 by the complainant under this subsection no later than 18 months 101 after the filing of the complaint. The filing commencement of 102 such action divests shall divest the commission of jurisdiction 103 of the complaint, except that the commission may intervene in 104 the civil action as a matter of right. Notwithstanding this 105 subsection the above, the state and its agencies and 106 subdivisions may shall not be liable for punitive damages. The 107 total amount of recovery against the state and its agencies and 108 subdivisions may shall not exceed the limitation as set forth in 109 s. 768.28(5). 110 Section 2.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 111 made by this act to section 760.11, Florida Statutes, in a 112 reference thereto, section 760.07, Florida Statutes, is 113 reenacted to read: 114 760.07âRemedies for unlawful discrimination.âAny violation 115 of any Florida statute that makes unlawful discrimination 116 because of race, color, religion, gender, pregnancy, national 117 origin, age, handicap, or marital status in the areas of 118 education, employment, or public accommodations gives rise to a 119 cause of action for all relief and damages described in s. 120 760.11(5), unless greater damages are expressly provided for. If 121 the statute prohibiting unlawful discrimination provides an 122 administrative remedy, the action for equitable relief and 123 damages provided for in this section may be initiated only after 124 the plaintiff has exhausted his or her administrative remedy. 125 The term âpublic accommodationsâ does not include lodge halls or 126 other similar facilities of private organizations which are made 127 available for public use occasionally or periodically. The right 128 to trial by jury is preserved in any case in which the plaintiff 129 is seeking actual or punitive damages. 130 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.